Hawaii statutes.
[§557A-405] Rental property. To the
extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property pursuant to
this section, an amount received as rent of real or personal property,
including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease, shall be
allocated to income. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a
security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods,
shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and
shall not be available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee's
contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount. [L
2000, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next